California statutes. Public Resources Code
Such taxes shall be assessed, levied, and collected at the same time and in the same manner as other county taxes are assessed, levied, and collected, and shall, when collected, be deposited with the treasurer of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5572.

The boundaries of any district may be altered and new contiguous territory annexed, incorporated, and included and made a part of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

5572.1.

Where the annexation of territory to a district would otherwise be valid, except that such annexed territory was not within the boundaries of a municipal utility district organized and existing under Chapter 218 of the Statutes of 1921, or the Municipal Utility District Act, such annexation shall be valid. This section shall be applied retroactively to validate the annexation of such territory to a district as of the date that the annexation would otherwise have been valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5580.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5594 or any other law, upon approval by the board of directors of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District, the design-build process described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code may be used to award contracts for the construction, restoration, and improvement of buildings and facilities, the construction, restoration, and improvement of public access and recreation facilities, and nature-based infrastructure projects, including, but not limited to, habitat restoration projects, enhancement and remediation projects, and watershed, stream corridor, and pond improvement projects in that district.

(b) The minimum project limitation of one million dollars ($1,000,000), as
 described in subdivision (a) of Section 22162 of the Public Contract Code, shall not apply to the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District.

(c) For purposes of this section, all references in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to “local agency” shall mean the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District and its board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 169.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5581.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5594 or any other law, upon approval by the board of directors of the East Bay Regional Park District, the design-build process described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code may be used to award contracts for the construction, restoration, and improvement of buildings and facilities, the construction, restoration, and improvement of public access and recreation facilities, and nature-based infrastructure projects, including, but not limited to, habitat restoration projects, enhancement and remediation projects, and watershed, stream corridor, and pond improvement projects in that district.

(b) The minimum project limitation of one million dollars ($1,000,000), as described in
 subdivision (a) of Section 22162 of the Public Contract Code, shall not apply to the East Bay Regional Park District.

(c) For purposes of this section, all references in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to “local agency” shall mean the East Bay Regional Park District and its board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 170.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5590.

The bonds of any district issued pursuant to this article, are legal investments for all trust funds, and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State school funds; and whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts in the State of California, such money or funds may be invested in district bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of this article; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or municipalities may by law be used as security for the performance of any act, district bonds may be so
 used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5591.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall have the same force, value, and use as bonds issued by any municipality in this State, and shall be free and exempt from all taxation within this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5593.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of districts which are not provided for in this article shall be provided for by the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5594.

All contracts for furnishing supplies, materials, labor, or other valuable consideration furnished the district, for maintenance projects involving contractor services to preserve, maintain, or repair any existing building, structure, or improvement, or for constructing any new building, structure, or improvement, when the expenditures will exceed the applicable amount specified in Section 5549, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, after notice inviting bids, published in a newspaper in the district at least one week before the time of receiving bids. The board of directors may reject all bids and readvertise, or by a five-sevenths vote may elect
 to purchase the materials or supplies in the open market, or to construct the building, structure, or improvement by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5595.

This article shall be liberally construed to promote its objects and to carry out its intents and purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. East Bay Hills Conservation Program [5598. - 5598.]

5598.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the East Bay Hills Conservation Program.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The East Bay Hills encompass a unique landscape providing wildlife habitat, recreational opportunities, and significant ecological benefits, covering an area of approximately 30,000 acres in the Counties of Alameda and Contra Costa.

(2) The East Bay Hills are a resource of statewide cultural, historical, and environmental significance, facing development pressures and impacts from growing urbanization which threaten their ecological integrity and recreational
 value.

(3) The East Bay Hills are the ancestral land of the Ohlone and Bay Miwok who occupied the area for 10,000 years. Today, they are represented by the Ohlone Indian Tribe, the Muwekma Ohlone Indian Tribe of the San Francisco Bay Area, and the Confederated Villages of Lisjan Nation.

(4) Recognized as a unique and valuable state resource, the East Bay Hills were protected from resource extraction in the early 1900s, further codified in a 1933 statute authorizing the creation of the East Bay Regional Park District to manage and conserve the natural landscape.

(5) The East Bay Hills encompass approximately 30 miles of wildland-urban interface for which the East Bay Regional Park District provides ongoing wildfire mitigation for the safety of the environment and community.

(6) The East Bay Hills provide critical corridors for wildlife, connecting the coastal ranges with the inland foothills.

(7) The East Bay Hills are home to California’s official state grass, Nassella pulchra, or purple needlegrass, as well as the federal- and state-listed endangered species Presidio clarkia and Tiburon buckwheat.

(8) In 1855, Oncorhynchus mykiss, rainbow trout, were first discovered by scientists within the Redwood Creek in the East Bay Hills and continue to thrive today.

(9) Residents of surrounding cities and visitors throughout the state use the East Bay Hills for outdoor recreation, connecting with nature and promoting well-being.

(10) The East Bay Skyline National
 Recreation Trail traverses through six of the East Bay’s most historic and picturesque parks and preserves, including the largest remaining natural stand of coast redwood found in the East Bay.

(11) The natural resources of the East Bay Hills contribute to climate resilience through carbon sequestration, water management, watershed health, erosion control, and habitat preservation.

(12) Furthermore, during times of high heat, the landscape serves as a place of respite, with the redwood forests holding cooler temperatures than surrounding urban areas.

(13) Protection of the East Bay Hills aligns with state and local conservation efforts, including local habitat conservation plans.

(14) If the East Bay Hills Conservation Program is established pursuant to
 this article, it will provide a necessary structure to implement restoration and preservation projects and recreational opportunities, and enhance the overall condition of the East Bay Hills.

(c) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “California tribe” means any federally recognized California Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(2) “District” means the East Bay Regional Park District.

(3) “East Bay Hills” refers to the area defined by the ridgeline extending from the northern edge of Wildcat Canyon Regional Park to the southern edge of Lake Chabot Regional Park. “East Bay Hills”
 includes all adjacent natural lands within the control of the district, including the Sobrante Ridge Regional Preserve, Kennedy Grove Regional Recreation Area, Charles Lee Tilden Regional Park, Tilden Nature Area, Claremont Canyon Regional Preserve, Temescal Regional Recreation Area, Sibley Volcanic Regional Preserve, Huckleberry Botanic Regional Preserve, Dr. Aurelia Reinhardt Redwood Regional Park, Roberts Regional Recreation Area, Leona Canyon Open Space Regional Preserve, and Anthony Chabot Regional Park.

(4) “Natural lands” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 9001.5.

(5) “Program” means the East Bay Hills Conservation Program established pursuant to this article.

(d) The district may establish and administer the East Bay Hills Conservation Program to address the
 resource and recreational goals of the East Bay Hills pursuant to this article.

(e) The district may collaborate with California tribes, and state, regional, and local partners to help achieve both of the following goals of the program:

(1) To restore, enhance, and preserve wildlife habitat, provide and enhance recreational opportunities, restore and preserve natural ecosystems, increase nature-based resilience to extreme weather events, and develop and maintain trails for public access.

(2) To ensure the protection and preservation of land and natural resources, including addressing water quality, erosion, and carbon sequestration from natural lands, while promoting educational experiences for the community.

(f) In carrying out the purposes of this
 article, the district shall have all necessary rights and powers to achieve the goals under subdivision (d), including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Acquiring and disposing of interests in real property.

(2) Undertaking, maintaining, and funding projects to enhance public access, restore natural habitats, and improve and construct new facilities for outdoor recreation.

(3) Providing technical assistance to landowners on best practices to enhance conservation and climate resilience on natural lands.

(4) Implementing wildlife connectivity measures across major roadways and urban barriers.

(g) The East Bay Hills shall be acknowledged as an area of statewide significance in
 local land use policy documents, such as general and specific plans, developed or updated on or after January 1, 2026, affecting land use within the East Bay Hills.

(h) This article shall not be construed as an expansion of the district’s rights or powers as they relate to local land use authority on lands in the East Bay Hills.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.1. Puente Hills Landfill Open-Space Dedication [5600. - 5600.]

5600.

(a) The owner of the disposal site known as the Puente Hills Landfill, located in an unincorporated portion of the County of Los Angeles, shall dedicate as open-space property within the disposal site, pursuant to the terms of condition 14 (a) of Los Angeles County Conditional Use Permit 92–250 (4). This dedication shall include the buffer zone, and “Canyon 6,” “Canyon 7,” and “Canyon 8” as specified in the conditional use permit.

(b) The owner of the disposal site referred to in subdivision (a) shall enter into an agreement with the Los Angeles County Department of Parks and Recreation for use of the disposal area as a public park when solid waste disposal activities are complete, as referenced in and modified by condition 14 (b) of Los Angeles County Conditional Use Permit 92–250 (4). This agreement shall include the funding for the preparation of a park master plan, and for the full development, operation, and maintenance of the park, in an amount appropriate to the level of development shown on the master plan.

(c) The consultation specified in Part VIII of the monitoring program of Los Angeles Conditional Use Permit 92–250 (4), relating to the Puente Hills Landfill Citizens Advisory Committee, shall include the subject of landscaping of the mitigation berm specified in condition 10 (b), and shall also include any other planning matters that would affect the physical development or future use of the landfill site. The committee shall include members of the Hacienda Heights Improvement Association.

(d) The Joint Powers Authority established pursuant to condition 15 of Los Angeles County Conditional Use Permit 92–250 (4) shall give due consideration to purchasing parcels near the landfill property, specifically those parcels near the Hacienda Heights area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 141.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.2. Roberti-Z'berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program [5620. - 5631.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5620. - 5623.]

5620.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, the Roberti-Z'berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 1.2.)
-------------------------------------------

5621.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “City” and “county” both include the City and County of San Francisco; “county” does not include a county service area, or zone therein, within the County of San Bernardino empowered to provide public park and recreation services pursuant to the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code).

(b) “Districts” means regional park districts formed under Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3; recreation and park districts formed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780); any public utility district formed under Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501) of the Public Utilities Code in a nonurbanized area that employs a full-time park and recreation director and offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by the district; any community services district formed under Division 3 (commencing with Section 61000) of Title 6 of the Government Code in a nonurbanized area which is authorized to provide public recreation as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 61600 of the Government Code; any memorial district formed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1170) of Division 6 of the Military and Veterans Code that employs a full-time park and recreation director and offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by the district; the Malaga County Water District exercising powers authorized under Section 31133 of the Water Code; and any county service area, or zone therein, within the County of San Bernardino which is empowered to provide public park and recreation services pursuant to the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code), which is actually providing public park and recreation services, and which was reorganized prior to January 1, 1987, from a park and recreation district to a county service area or zone.

(c) “Urbanized area” consists of a central city or cities and surrounding closely settled territory, as determined by the Department of Finance on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data. “Urbanized county” means any county with a population of 200,000 or more, as determined by the Department of Finance on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data.

(d) “Heavily urbanized area” means a large city with a population of 300,000 or more and a large county or regional park district with a population of 1,000,000 or more, as determined by the Department of Finance on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data.

(e) “Nonurbanized area” means any city, county, or district which does not qualify as an urbanized area or urbanized county under the definitions in subdivision (c).

(f) “Block grant” means the allocation of moneys for one or more projects for the acquisition or development of recreational lands and facilities.

(g) “Need basis grant” means the allocation of moneys for one or more projects for the acquisition or development of recreational lands and facilities on a project-by-project basis, based upon need.

(h) “Account” means the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Account in the General Fund.

(i) “Special major maintenance project” means a rehabilitation or refurbishing activity performed on an annual or more infrequent interval, excluding capital improvements and routinized or other regularly scheduled and performed tasks such as grounds mowing, hedge trimming, garbage removal, and watering. Special major maintenance project includes activities which will reduce energy requirements to operate recreational lands or facilities.

(j) “Innovative recreation program” means specially designed, creative social, cultural, and human service activities which by their nature are intended to respond to the unique and otherwise unmet recreation needs of special urban populations, including, but not limited to, senior citizens, physically or emotionally handicapped, chronic and “new” poor, single parents, “latchkey” children, and minorities. The term includes special transportation programs designed to facilitate access of these groups to parks and recreational programs and facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5622.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) The demand for recreation areas, facilities, and programs in California is far greater than the present supply, with the number of people who cannot be accommodated at the area of their choice or any comparable area increasing rapidly.

(b) The demand for recreation areas, facilities, and programs in the urban areas of our state are even greater: over 90 percent of the present population of California reside in urban areas; there continues to be approximately a 30-percent deficiency in open-space and recreation areas in the metropolitan areas of the state; less urban land is available, costs are escalating, and competition for land is increasing; and lack of sufficient annual operating funds has resulted in a general deterioration of existing facilities.

(c) There is a high concentration of urban social problems in California’s major metropolitan areas which can be partially alleviated by increased recreational opportunities.

(d) Within the urban areas there reside a broad spectrum and heavy concentration of special populations, including senior citizens, physically and emotionally handicapped, chronic and “new” poor, single parents, “latchkey children,” and minorities, who typically are unable, because of a variety of limiting circumstances, to avail themselves of use of remote, nonurban state and national parks and open spaces.

(e) The upward spiral in the cost of energy for private automobiles and all forms of public transportation during the recent period has further limited access to remote state and national parks and open spaces, and this provides an additional emphasis to the urgent need for close-to-home urban parks and open spaces. 

(f) The need for local recreation areas, facilities, and programs is doubling at 10-year intervals.

(g) Unless the lands and waters that currently have significant recreation potential today are acquired or reserved for recreation as soon as possible, and unless there is a means available to provide a regularized, major rehabilitation program for existing facilities, there will be a marked shortage of recreation lands and waters on a local and regional basis.

(h) Cities, counties, and districts must exercise constant vigilance to see that the recreation lands and facilities they now have are not lost to other uses; they should acquire additional lands as such lands become available; and they should take steps to improve the facilities they now have.

(i) The state recognizes its partnership role with local government agencies and officials, in support of acquisition, development, and major rehabilitation of parks and open spaces in urbanized areas and heavily urbanized areas, as a means of fulfilling state support, and a proper level of response to the overwhelmingly large percentage of state residents whose parks and open-space needs can only be addressed in urban settings.

(j) The state further recognizes that every effort is necessary and appropriate to find and utilize resources, other than those secured exclusively through tax levies, in order to support and maintain this significant urban program.

(k) In view of the foregoing, the Legislature declares that an aggressive, coordinated, funded program for meeting existing and projected local recreation demands must be implemented without delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5623.

Grants to cities, counties, and districts pursuant to this chapter are intended to supplement and not to supplant local expenditures for park and recreation areas and facilities or to diminish in any way then current efforts for providing parks and recreation services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 160.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [5624. - 5631.]

5624.

(a) The program established by this chapter shall be administered by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) The Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Account is hereby created in the General Fund and the money therein is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the program established by this chapter and funded pursuant to Item 271 of the Budget Act of 1976, Item 227 of the Budget Act of 1977, Item 222 of the Budget Act of 1978, Item 235 of the Budget Act of 1979, and Section 4 of Chapter 1166 of the Statutes of 1979, and pursuant to statutes enacted subsequent thereto that appropriate funds for this program.

(c) The unallocated balance in the General Fund appropriated pursuant to Item 271 of the Budget Act of 1976, Item 227 of the Budget Act of 1977, Item 222 of the Budget Act of 1978, Item 235 of the Budget Act of 1979, and Section 4 of Chapter 1166 of the Statutes of 1979 is hereby transferred to the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5624.5.

An amount equal to one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per capita of the state on the January 1 of the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the transfer is made, as specified in the Budget Act, shall be transferred annually to the Roberti-Z'berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Account from the Special Account for Capital Outlay in the General Fund for the 1986–87 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter. Notwithstanding Section 5624, the funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section shall be available for expenditure only when appropriated by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. This section shall not preclude the Legislature from augmenting this amount for the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program from other fund sources, including tideland oil revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5624.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, grants from moneys appropriated from the Parklands Fund of 1984 shall be made according to, and are governed by, this chapter as it existed on June 5, 1984. However, Section 5625.3, where applicable, shall be complied with regardless of the source of moneys for the grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5625.

(a) Annual grants shall be made to cities, counties, and districts for recreational purposes, open-space purposes, or both, on the basis of population and need, as specified in this chapter. The director shall, by regulation, specify the procedures to be followed in applying for grant funds. The director shall propose criteria for determining priority of need, conduct public hearings on those proposed criteria, and, following the hearings, shall submit the proposed criteria to the Legislature for its approval by statute within 60 days of submission of the criteria. A new, revised, or amended criterion or a criterion to be deleted shall be submitted to the Legislature for its approval by statute. Following legislative approval, the director shall establish the criteria and publish them in the California Code of Regulations. The criteria, and a change thereof, shall be distributed in a convenient form to potential applicants.

(b) The director shall, by regulation, require the recipient of a grant under this chapter to submit periodic reports to the department with respect to its use of the grant, but the reports shall not be required to be submitted more frequently than annually.

(c) All projects and programs for which a grant is received shall be subject to state audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 68, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5625.2.

Block grants may be made pursuant to this chapter for the rehabilitation of historical structures so long as the structure is located within a park or recreation area and the structure’s rehabilitation will complement or enhance the recreational use of the park or recreational area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1474, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5625.3.

In addition to the application procedures specified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5625, prior to submitting an application for a grant for a project involving the acquisition of productive agricultural lands or other lands the acquisition of which may have an adverse economic impact on neighboring agricultural operations, the city, county, or district proposing to make the application shall hold a public hearing within the county in which the proposed project is located at which members of the public may comment on the proposed project. Notice of the hearing shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. A summary of comments made at the hearing by members of the public and representatives of the city, county, or district shall accompany the application. Copies of the summary shall also be available for inspection and review by any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5625.5.

Grants made to cities, counties, and districts for each fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5625 shall be based on the jurisdictional boundaries of recipients as of July 1st.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1166.)
-------------------------------------------

5626.

(a) The property acquired or developed pursuant to this chapter shall be used by the grant recipient only for the purpose for which the grant moneys were requested and no other use of the area shall be permitted except by the specific act of the Legislature. Any project funded with grant moneys received pursuant to this chapter shall conform to the recreation element of any applicable city or county general plan.

(b) Notwithstanding Item 271 of the Budget Act of 1976, Item 227 of the Budget Act of 1977, Item 222 of the Budget Act of 1978, Section 5627, 5628, 5629, or 5630, or any other provisions of law, jurisdictions eligible to receive need basis or block grant moneys pursuant to this chapter shall have one year from the effective date of each act appropriating grant moneys to apply for such grant moneys. Such moneys that are not applied for during the one-year period shall be allocated by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5630 during the succeeding fiscal year as grants to cities and recreation and park districts in urbanized areas on a project-by-project basis and on the basis of need.

(c) (1) Grant moneys shall be encumbered by the recipient of such moneys within three years of the date of approval by the director of the application for such moneys. Any part of grant moneys not encumbered within the three-year period shall revert to the unallocated balance in the account and may be reallocated by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5630 not later than the end of the next succeeding fiscal year.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subdivision, grant moneys appropriated by Item 271 of the Budget Act of 1976, Item 227 of the Budget Act of 1977, Item 222 of the Budget Act of 1978, Item 235 of the Budget Act of 1979, and Section 4 of Chapter 1166 of the Statutes of 1979, if the grant application is approved by the director prior to September 17, 1980, may be encumbered within three years of the date of grant approval or by December 31, 1981, whichever date is later.

(d) The legal counsel of the grant recipient shall certify to the department that the grant recipient has met, or will meet, all federal, state, and local environmental, public health, relocation, affirmative action, and clearinghouse requirements and all other appropriate codes, laws, and regulations prior to the expenditure of the grant funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 500, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5626.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 5625 and 5626, the Olivehurst Public Utility District may use the Youth Center Building in Olivehurst, which was developed pursuant to a grant made under Section 5625, for youth and adult recreational programs, community service programs, and other public benefit and recreational programs consistent with the jurisdiction of the Olivehurst Public Utility District.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 5625 and 5626, the Olivehurst Public Utility District may lease or enter into other forms of agreement for the recreational or community service use of the Youth Center Building in Olivehurst by public or private organizations or individuals, under terms and conditions approved by the Board of Directors of the Olivehurst Public Utility District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5626.3.

Notwithstanding Sections 5625 and 5626, the County of Los Angeles may convert to a use not authorized under those provisions not more than 9.67 acres of parkland in El Cariso Park, if the county complies with the Public Park Preservation Act of 1971 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5400)), and submits to the department a copy of all documents evidencing the county’s interest in the substitute parkland required under the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5627.

(a) Grant moneys received pursuant to this chapter shall be expended for high priority projects that satisfy the most urgent park and recreation needs, with emphasis on unmet needs in the most heavily populated and most economically disadvantaged areas within each jurisdiction.

(b) Grants received pursuant to this chapter shall be expended only for acquisition, development, or both, except that not more than 30 percent of the amount received by a city, county, or district in an annual period may be utilized for special major maintenance projects, provided the projects are related to land acquired or developed, or both, in whole or in part, with state moneys under this chapter, or for innovative recreation programs, or for both.

(c) Grants to cities, counties, and districts pursuant to this chapter shall be on the basis of 70 percent state money and 30 percent local matching money, not less than one-third of which shall be from private or nonstate sources of funds, for the project. Grants for acquisition shall be matched only by money or property donated to be part of the acquisition project. Grants for development may be matched by monetary contributions or, if nonmonetary contributions, as provided in regulations and standards which shall be established by the director after a public hearing. The component of local matching money consisting of funds from private or nonstate sources may, at the option of the grant recipient, be calculated as a percentage of the total amount granted in that fiscal year to a grant recipient, rather than on a project-by-project basis.

(d) The component of local matching money from private or nonstate sources required by subdivision (c) may be in the form of and include, but is not limited to, the following: cash donations, gifts of real property, equipment, and consumable supplies, volunteer services, free or reduced-cost use of lands, facilities, or equipment, and bequests and earnings from wills, estates, and trusts. Funds from nonstate sources that qualify for the purposes of subdivision (c) are funds from the federal government and local public agencies other than the grant recipient. Real property, cash, or other assets required to be transferred to a public agency pursuant to Section 66477 of the Government Code or any other provision of law may not qualify as funds from a private or nonstate source; however, they shall qualify as the monetary or nonmonetary contribution required to be furnished by the grant recipient pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The grant recipient shall certify to the department that there is available, or will become available prior to the encumbrance of any state funds for any work on the project for which application for a grant has been made, matching money from private or nonstate sources. Certification of the source and amount of nonstate funds shall be set forth in the application for a grant submitted to the department. However, in recognition of the fact that raising private funds frequently requires an initial evidence of matching public funds, the certification of the source and amount of the private funds shall be made by the applicant at least 30 days prior to actual release of state funds.

(f) Local matching money may not be required with respect to an applicant that has urgent unmet needs for recreational lands or facilities, and lacks the financial resources to acquire or develop recreational lands or facilities, as determined pursuant to a formula set forth in regulations adopted by the director after a public hearing. In addition, with respect to applications for grants submitted for areas where private financial resources are of limited availability or submitted for projects or programs that are not of a type likely to attract private funds, the director shall, if the project conforms to regulations adopted by the department, waive the requirement that at least one-third of local matching money be from private sources. The regulations shall establish criteria and procedures for the waiver. These criteria may provide for consideration of the average per capita income, unemployment rate, crime rate, and recent history of plant or business closures in the area of the applicant’s jurisdiction where the grant will be expended.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f), funds from the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act of 2002 (Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600)) that are or have been appropriated on or before June 30, 2004, for the purposes of this chapter do not require local matching money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 23.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5628.

Sixty-nine percent of the moneys available for grant purposes in any one fiscal year shall be available only for block grants to cities, counties, and districts in urbanized areas for the acquisition or development of, or for special major maintenance of, recreational lands and facilities, or for innovative recreation programs, and shall be apportioned on the basis of population in the following manner:

(a) Sixty percent of the moneys shall be allocated to cities and to districts in urbanized areas in the proportion that the population of the jurisdiction bears to the population of all cities and districts in urbanized areas throughout the state. Recognizing that the boundaries of cities and of districts may overlap, only the population of the jurisdiction which will actually provide and administer the recreational service contemplated shall be counted in the area of overlapping jurisdiction. The population of districts within urbanized areas shall be certified by the board of supervisors of each county.

(b) Forty percent of the moneys shall be allocated to urbanized counties and to regional park districts in urbanized areas in the proportion that the total population of the jurisdiction bears to the total population of all urbanized counties and regional park districts in urbanized areas throughout the state. Recognizing that the boundaries of counties and regional park districts may overlap, only the population of the jurisdiction which will actually provide and administer the recreational service contemplated shall be counted in the area of overlapping jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 221, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5629.

Fourteen percent of the moneys available for grant purposes in any one fiscal year shall be available only for block grants to cities, counties, and regional park districts in heavily urbanized areas for the acquisition or development of, or for special major maintenance of, recreational lands and facilities, or for innovative recreation programs, and shall be apportioned on the basis of population in the following manner:
